Tennessee, session 114, HB1481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 15, Chapter 2, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
The third Sunday in June of each year is observed as "Fathers' Day," to honor
the noble and indispensable role that fathers play in Tennessee families.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010845